Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2275.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1372 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1372. Exceptional Children; Education and Training.--* * *(9) Time Period for Initial Evaluation to Determine Children with Disabilities.(i) An initial evaluation by a school entity to determine whether a child is a child with a disability under Federal law shall be completed and a copy of the evaluation shall be presented to the parents of the child not later than sixty (60) consecutive school days after the school entity receives 1234567891011121314151617181920 parental consent for the evaluation.(ii) For the purpose of this paragraph, the term "school entity" means a school district, intermediate unit, approved private school, State-operated program or facility or other public or private organization that provides educational services to children with disabilities or early intervention services. The term does not include a charter school or cyber charter school under Article XVII-A.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2275PN2975 - 2 - 123456789